src/fst/stems/adverbs.lexc
LEXICON adverbs
кепе:кепе ADV_KUDO  "paljain jaloin" ;
эль-эль:эль-эль ADV_KAL  "" ;
пельксэнь-пелькс:пельксэнь-пелькс ADV_OSH  "" ;
лишнойстэ:лишнойстэ A-DER/ELA-ADV-MANNER  "" ;
апарсте:апарсте MANNER_  "XX" ;
кромойстэ:кромойстэ MANNER_  "ontuen" ;
вельть:вельть Ad-A_  "" ;
дюм:дюм Ad-A_  "" ;
зыглый:зыглый Ad-A_  "" ;
пек:пек Ad-A_  "hyvin" ;
пельс:пельс Ad-A_  "" ;
тунь:тунь Ad-A_  "" ;
комадо:комадо PRED2-SUBJ_KUDO  "" ;
кунст:кунст Pred2  "" ;
ландядо:ландядо PRED2-SUBJ_KUDO  "" ;
ласте:ласте PRED2-SUBJ_KUDO  "" ;
лондадо:лондадо PRED2-SUBJ_KUDO  "" ;
наксадо:наксадо PRED2-SUBJ_KUDO  "" ;
озадо:озадо PRED2-SUBJ_KUDO  "istuallaan" ;
панжадо:панжадо PRED2-SUBJ_KUDO  "" ;
пульзядо:пульзядо AdvState-kudo  "" ;
стядо:стядо PRED2-SUBJ_KUDO  "seisaallaan" ;
чавонь% кедть:чавонь% кедть Pred2  "" ;
штадо:штадо AdvState-kudo  "" ;
штапо:штапо AdvState-kudo  "" ;
ялго:ялго PRED2-SUBJ_KUDO  "jalkaisin" ;
иредьстэ:иредьстэ PRED2-SUBJ_KUDO  "" ;
иредьстэ:иретьстэ PRED2-SUBJ_KUDO_Sub  "" ;
авапрясо:авапрясо Adv-Ine  "" ;
авторитетна:авторитетна ADV_  "" ;
ансяк:ансяк Exclusive  "vain" ;
беремасо:беремасо Adv-Ine  "" ;
вазокс:вазокс ADV_-TRA  "" ;
вайгелень% апак% нолда:вайгелень% апак% нолда Adv_Phrase  "" ;
валанясто:валанясто ADV_  "" ;
валонь% апак% учо:валонь% апак% учо Adv_Phrase  "" ;
вашокс:вашокс ADV_-TRA  "" ;
видеяк:видеяк ADV-PARENTHETIC_  "" ;
виевекс:виевекс ADV_-TRA  "" ;
виень% апак% жаля:виень% апак% жаля Adv_Phrase  "" ;
вишкинестэ:вишкинестэ ADV_  "" ;
вырр:вырр ADV-IDEOPH  "" ;
дуборсо:дуборсо ADV-IDEOPH-IS-INE  "" ;
дубот:дубот ADV-IDEOPH  "" ;
зорякс:зорякс ADV_-TRA  "" ;
зуйк:зуйк ADV-IDEOPH  "" ;
зуйсэ:зуйсэ ADV-IDEOPH-IS-INE  "" ;
истяк:истяк ADV_LAK  "" ;
истямо% ладсо:истямо% ладсо Adv-Ine  "" ;
кайтянь-кать:кайтянь-кать Adv_Phrase  "" ;
кашторсо:кашторсо ADV-IDEOPH-IS-INE  "" ;
кевекс:кевекс ADV_-TRA  "" ;
кедень% апак% максо:кедень% апак% максо Adv-Ine  "" ;
келес:келес ADV_  "" ;
мей:мей ADV_KAL  "takaperin" ;
клявк:клявк ADV-IDEOPH  "" ;
коволокс:коволокс ADV_-TRA  "" ;
честна:честна ADV_KUDO  "rehellisesti" ;
корсо:корсо ADV-IDEOPH-IS-INE  "" ;
кувакасто:кувакасто ADV_  "" ;
лавожакс:лавожакс ADV_-TRA  "" ;
лангсек-лангсек:лангсек-лангсек Adv_Phrase  "" ;
лип:лип ADV-IDEOPH  "" ;
ломанькс:ломанькс ADV_-TRA  "" ;
лосьсэ:лосьсэ ADV-IDEOPH-IS-INE  "" ;
малацекс:малацекс ADV_  "" ;
мелень% апак% путо:мелень% апак% путо Adv_Phrase  "" ;
мелень% ютавтомга:мелень% ютавтомга Adv_Phrase  "" ;
нумолокс:нумолокс ADV_-TRA  "" ;
оймень% апак% тално:оймень% апак% тално Adv_Phrase  "" ;
оймень% ды% седеень% бажамосо:оймень% ды% седеень% бажамосо Adv-Ine  "" ;
пакшт:пакшт ADV-IDEOPH  "" ;
парсте:парсте ADV_  "hyvin" ;
пекстерьсэ:пекстерьсэ ADV-IDEOPH-IS-INE  "" ;
пецек-пецек:пецек-пецек Adv_Phrase  "" ;
пецерьсэ:пецерьсэ ADV-IDEOPH-IS-INE  "" ;
польдерьсэ:польдерьсэ ADV-IDEOPH-IS-INE  "" ;
ревекс:ревекс ADV_-TRA  "" ;
састынька:састынька ADV_  "" ;
стяко:стяко ADV_  "" ;
сюронь% кекшема% тарка:сюронь% кекшема% тарка Adv_Phrase  "" ;
сёрсо:сёрсо ADV-IDEOPH-IS-INE  "" ;
сётор:сётор ADV-IDEOPH  "" ;
цятор-цютор:цятор-цютор ADV-IDEOPH  "" ;
цяторсо:цяторсо ADV-IDEOPH-IS-INE  "" ;
чавосто:чавосто ADV_  "" ;
самай:самай Ad-A_  "juuri" ;
чикор-лакор:чикор-лакор ADV-IDEOPH  "" ;
шумбрасто:шумбрасто ADV_  "" ;
якшт:якшт ADV-IDEOPH  "" ;
ёколт-ёколт:ёколт-ёколт Adv_Phrase  "" ;
ялатеке:ялатеке ADV_KUDO  "kuitenkin" ;
алашакс:алашакс MANNER_-TRA  "" ;
апарсте:апарсте MANNER_  "" ;
вадрясто:вадрясто MANNER_-ELA  "hyvin" ;
даволкс:даволкс MANNER_-TRA  "" ;
истяня:истяня MANNER_  "sillä tavalla" ;
казямосто:казямосто MANNER_-ELA  "" ;
калгодосто:калгодосто MANNER_-ELA  "" ;
кежевстэ:кежевстэ MANNER_-ELA  "" ;
мейгенерть:мейгенерть MANNER_  "" ;
эрязасто:эрязасто MANNER_-ELA  "" ;
шумбрасто-парсте:шумбрасто-парсте MANNER_-ELA  "" ;
ёндолокс:ёндолокс MANNER_-TRA  "" ;
ёнсто:ёнсто MANNER_-ELA  "" ;
истя:истя MANNER_  "niin" ;
таймазасто:таймазасто MANNER_-ELA  "" ;
эрейстэ:эрейстэ MANNER_-ELA  "" ;
авасов:авасов Spat_  "" ;
алов% ведть:алов% ведть Spat_  "" ;
васов:васов Spat_  "kauas" ;
видьга:видьга Spat_  "" ;
видьшка:видьшка Spat_  "" ;
икелев:икелев Spat_  "" ;
кершев:кершев SPAT-Lat  "" ;
косто:косто ADV-INTERR-IS-SPAT-ELA  "" ;
мейс:мейс Spat_  "" ;
мекев-васов:мекев-васов Spat_  "" ;
обедъёндо:обедъёндо Spat_  "" ;
пачк:пачк ADV_TEMP  "aina" ;
пачк:пачк ADV-SPAT_  "läpi" ;
пачка:пачка Spat_  "" ;
сезэнь:сезэнь ADV_IS_ILL  "" ;
сезэнь:сезэ ADV_IS_ILL  "" ;
сеске:сеске ADV_IS_INE  "" ;
сеске:сеск ADV_IS_INE  "" ;
сесэ:сесэ ADV_IS_INE  "" ;
тезэнь:тезэнь ADV_IS_ILL  "" ;
тезэнь:тезэ ADV_IS_ILL  "" ;
теск:теск ADV_IS_ILL  "" ;
теске:теске ADV_IS_INE  "" ;
тесэ:тесэ ADV_IS_INE  "täällä" ;
тесэ-тосо:тесэ-тосо ADV_IS_INE  "" ;
тозонь:тозонь ADV_IS_ILL  "" ;
тозонь:тозо ADV_IS_ILL  "" ;
тоск:тоск ADV_IS_ILL  "" ;
тоско:тоско ADV_IS_INE  "" ;
тосо:тосо ADV_IS_INE  "siellä" ;
а% кувать:а% кувать ADV-TEMP_KIT  "" ;
а% курок:а% курок ADV-TEMP_LAK  "" ;
буряне:буряне ADV_TEMP  "" ;
валдова:валдова Temp-Prl  "" ;
валске:валске ADV-TEMP_KUDO  "aamulla" ;
ванды:ванды ADV_TEMP  "huomenna" ;
кавонькирда:кавонь#кирда ADV_KUDO  "" ;
вандыде% мейле:вандыде% мейле ADV_KUDO  "" ;
веньперть:вень#перть ADV_TEMP  "" ;
знярсыя:знярсыя Temp-Indef  "" ;
зярдо:зярдо Temp-Interr  "" ;
зяросто:зяросто Temp-Interr  "" ;
зярсыя:зярсыя Temp-Indef  "" ;
икелепеле:икелепеле ADV_TEMP  "" ;
исяк:исяк ADV-TEMP_LAK  "eilen" ;
косто-косто:косто-косто Temp-Distr  "" ;
кувать:кувать ADV-TEMP_KIT  "kauan" ;
куватьс:куватьс Temp-Ill  "" ;
курок:курок ADV-TEMP_LAK  "nopeasti" ;
куроксто:куроксто ADV_TEMP  "" ;
маныть:маныть Temp-Pl  "" ;
мейле:мейле ADV-TEMP_KUDO  "sitten" ;
меля:меля ADV-TEMP_KUDO  "viime vuonna" ;
мелят:мелят Temp-Pl  "viime vuonna" ;
нацькес:нацькес Temp-Ill  "" ;
нейке:нейке ADV-TEMP_KUDO  "" ;
одсто:одсто Temp-Ela  "" ;
пелеве% шкане:пелеве% шкане ADV_TEMP  "" ;
пелеветь:пелеветь Temp-Pl  "" ;
пиземе% шкасто:пиземе% шкасто Temp-Ela  "" ;
седикеле:седикеле ADV_TEMP  "" ;
талай:талай ADV_TEMP  "kauan" ;
талайс:талайс Temp-Ill  "" ;
талайть:талайть Temp-Pl  "" ;
течике:течике ADV_TEMP  "" ;
течимс:течимс Temp-ms  "" ;
течис:течис Temp-Ill  "" ;
улкоть:улкоть ADV-TEMP_KIT  "" ;
умок:умок ADV-TEMP_LAK  "kauan sitten" ;
цютькес:цютькес Temp-Ill  "" ;
чи% валдова:чи% валдова Temp-Prl  "" ;
чи% куншка:чи% куншка ADV-TEMP_KUDO  "" ;
чинек-венек:чинек-венек Temp-Coll  "" ;
тевтеме:тевтеме ADV_KUDO  "" ;
чоп:чоп ADV_TEMP  "" ;
чоподава:чоподава Temp-Prl  "" ;
шкань-шкань:шкань-шкань Temp-Distr  "" ;
